Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-1107
Purchase price, defined.

Purchase price means the
amount paid to the issuer of a qualified equity investment for the qualified
equity investment.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 7.
January 1, 2012